Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3177
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Service Providers Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2026, LB901, § 4.
January 1, 2027